New Jersey, session 221, A1701.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1997, c.352 (C.30:4D-6f) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  An eligible alien, as defined in section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 [(C.30:4D-1 et seq.)] (C.30:4D-3), who [otherwise] meets all relevant eligibility criteria [therefor is] for medical assistance under section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6), shall be entitled to receive such medical assistance [provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-6).  An alien who] . b.    (1)  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, and after the Commissioner of Human Services determines that systems have been programmed for the implementation of this subsection, if an undocumented immigrant alien residing in New Jersey does not qualify for medical assistance as an eligible alien [but who is a resident of New Jersey and] under subsection a. of this section, and the alien, but for their immigration status, would otherwise be eligible for medical assistance provided pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1968, c.413 [is] (C.30:4D-6), such alien shall be entitled [only] to [care and services necessary for the treatment of an emergency medical condition as defined in section 1903(v)(3) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. s.1396b(v)(3))] receive such medical assistance. (2)   To the extent allowable, the commissioner shall attempt to maximize federal financial participation in implementing the provisions of this subsection, and shall seek any federal approvals as may be necessary to secure such federal financial participation.  If federal financial participation is not available, the benefits and services provided under this subsection shall be financed with State funds only. (3)   This subsection shall be implemented only to the extent that it is in compliance with the provisions of section 441(d) of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (8 U.S.C. s.1621(d)). (4)   As used in this subsection, undocumented immigrant alien means an alien who resides in New Jersey, but who is unable to produce documentary evidence to verify their status as an eligible alien, as defined by section 3 of P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-3), or to show that they are lawfully present in the United States. (cf: P.L.1997, c.352, s.2) 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately, but remain inoperable until the Commissioner of Human Services receives a determination of federal financial participation regarding the implementation of the provisions of subsection b. of section 2.  If federal financial participation is not approved, this act shall become operable with the use of State funds only.